Utah statutes.
57-16-18.   Notice required for change in land use or condemnation -- Local
ordinances forbidden.
(1) (a)  The owner of a mobile home park shall send notice using first-class
mail to each resident of the mobile home park of any planned change in land
use or condemnation of the park or any portion of the park at least nine
months before the day on which the resident is required to vacate the mobile
home park.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to a mobile home park condemned by a
government entity.
(2)  If the planned change in land use or condemnation requires the approval
of a governmental agency, the mobile home park owner, in addition to the
notice required by Subsection (1), shall send notice using first-class mail of
the date set for the initial hearing before the governmental agency to each
resident at least seven days before the date scheduled for the initial
hearing.
(3)  If a resident is not a resident of the mobile home park at the time
notice was sent under Subsection (1), the owner shall give written notice, of
the change of use to the resident before the resident occupies the mobile home
space, either by first-class mail or personal service.
(4)  During the period of time between the provision of notice under
Subsection (1) and the day on which the resident is required to vacate the
mobile home park, the mobile home park owner may not increase rent.
(5)  A town, city, or county may not enact any ordinance governing the closure
of a mobile home park.
